Ohio, session 136, HB402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.092 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.092. (A) The Cleveland metroparks system is 6
declared to be "Ohio's Emerald Necklace" for all of the 7
following reasons: 8
(1) To acknowledge the system as a nationally recognized 9
network of natural spaces, trails, waterways, and recreational 10
amenities spanning more than twenty-five thousand acres across 11
northeast Ohio; 12
(2) To honor the system's encircling layout of green 13
spaces that preserve natural beauty and provide public access to 14
nature, outdoor recreation, and environmental education; 15
(3) In recognition of the system's significant 16
contribution to the quality of life, public health, ecological 17
resilience, and tourism in northeast Ohio; 18
(4) In appreciation of the system, which serves over 19

H. B. No. 402 Page 2
As Introduced
nineteen million recreational visitors annually, and for being 20
an economic and cultural asset to this state. 21
(B) It is the intent of the general assembly that this 22
designation promotes continued appreciation, stewardship, and 23
investment in this state's natural heritage and public park 24
systems. 25
(C) The designation described in this section is honorary 26
in nature and shall not require the expenditure of state funds 27
for signage or other materials unless otherwise agreed upon by 28
public or private entities. 29